src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuql_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tuʼļ: # Noun 213 'eng /est tuli/fin' - full paradigm
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Nom: [tuʼļ, tuļ]
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Gen: [tuʼl, tul]
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Par: tūlda
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Dat: [tuʼllõn, tullõn]
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Ins: [tuʼlkõks, tulkõks]
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Ill: [tuʼllõ, tullõ]
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Ela: [tuʼlstõ, tulstõ]
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Nom: [tuʼld, tuld]
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuʼld, tuld]
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Par: [tuʼļḑi, tuļḑi]
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Dat: [tuʼldõn, tuldõn]
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Ins: [tuʼldkõks, tuldkõks]
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Ill: tuļīž
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Ela: [tuʼļšti, tuļšti]
